Contents/Resources/Wolfram Player.app/Contents/SystemFiles/Components/SpellingData/SpellingDictionaries/en_Supplemental.aff
FLAG num
SFX 721 N 1
SFX 721 0 ges .

SFX 722 N 1
SFX 722 0 geta .

SFX 723 N 1
SFX 723 0 ggrin .

SFX 724 N 1
SFX 724 0 gh .

SFX 725 N 1
SFX 725 0 ghold .

SFX 726 N 1
SFX 726 0 ghs .

SFX 727 N 1
SFX 727 0 gi .

SFX 728 N 1
SFX 728 0 gia .

SFX 729 N 1
SFX 729 0 gier .

SFX 730 N 1
SFX 730 0 giest .

SFX 731 N 1
SFX 731 0 gill .

SFX 732 N 1
SFX 732 0 gilloses .

SFX 733 N 1
SFX 733 0 gillosis .

SFX 734 N 1
SFX 734 0 gills .

SFX 735 N 1
SFX 735 0 ging .

SFX 736 N 1
SFX 736 0 gjin .

SFX 737 N 1
SFX 737 0 glass .

SFX 738 N 1
SFX 738 0 glasses .

SFX 739 N 1
SFX 739 0 glycerol .

SFX 740 N 1
SFX 740 0 glyoxime .

SFX 741 N 1
SFX 741 0 gmen .

SFX 742 N 1
SFX 742 0 go .

SFX 743 N 1
SFX 743 0 goer .

SFX 744 N 1
SFX 744 0 goers .

SFX 745 N 1
SFX 745 0 gonal .

SFX 746 N 1
SFX 746 0 gone .

SFX 747 N 1
SFX 747 0 gonium .

SFX 748 N 1
SFX 748 0 goric .

SFX 749 N 1
SFX 749 0 gotland .

SFX 750 N 1
SFX 750 0 gram .

SFX 751 N 1
SFX 751 0 graph .

SFX 752 N 1
SFX 752 0 graphic .

SFX 753 N 1
SFX 753 0 graphies .

SFX 754 N 1
SFX 754 0 graphist .

SFX 755 N 1
SFX 755 0 graphy .

SFX 756 N 1
SFX 756 0 grass .

SFX 757 N 1
SFX 757 0 grasses .

SFX 758 N 1
SFX 758 0 gree .

SFX 759 N 1
SFX 759 0 grees .

SFX 760 N 1
SFX 760 0 gs .

SFX 761 N 1
SFX 761 0 gshan .

SFX 762 N 1
SFX 762 0 gsu .

SFX 763 N 1
SFX 763 0 guete .

SFX 764 N 1
SFX 764 0 gurat .

SFX 765 N 1
SFX 765 0 gurats .

SFX 766 N 1
SFX 766 0 gxi .

SFX 767 N 1
SFX 767 0 gy .

SFX 768 N 1
SFX 768 0 gyan .

SFX 769 N 1
SFX 769 0 gyin .

SFX 770 N 1
SFX 770 0 gynic .

SFX 771 N 1
SFX 771 0 gynism .

SFX 772 N 1
SFX 772 0 gyou .

SFX 773 N 1
SFX 773 0 h .

SFX 774 N 1
SFX 774 0 han .

SFX 775 N 1
SFX 775 0 hara .

SFX 776 N 1
SFX 776 0 head .

SFX 777 N 1
SFX 777 0 heme .

SFX 778 N 1
SFX 778 0 hemin .

SFX 779 N 1
SFX 779 0 hen .

SFX 780 N 1
SFX 780 0 hes .

SFX 781 N 1
SFX 781 0 hett .

SFX 782 N 1
SFX 782 0 hiko .

SFX 783 N 1
SFX 783 0 hin .

SFX 784 N 1
SFX 784 0 hippus .

SFX 785 N 1
SFX 785 0 historic .

SFX 786 N 1
SFX 786 0 histories .

SFX 787 N 1
SFX 787 0 history .

SFX 788 N 1
SFX 788 0 ho .

SFX 789 N 1
SFX 789 0 hodniopomorskie .

SFX 790 N 1
SFX 790 0 hole .

SFX 791 N 1
SFX 791 0 holes .

SFX 792 N 1
SFX 792 0 hong .

SFX 793 N 1
SFX 793 0 hood .

SFX 794 N 1
SFX 794 0 hoods .

SFX 795 N 1
SFX 795 0 hoor .

SFX 796 N 1
SFX 796 0 hora .

SFX 797 N 1
SFX 797 0 hot .

SFX 798 N 1
SFX 798 0 hou .

SFX 799 N 1
SFX 799 0 hs .

SFX 800 N 1
SFX 800 0 hu .

SFX 801 N 1
SFX 801 0 huano .

SFX 802 N 1
SFX 802 0 hull .

SFX 803 N 1
SFX 803 0 hurland .

SFX 804 N 1
SFX 804 0 hydantoin .

SFX 805 N 1
SFX 805 0 hydantoins .

SFX 806 N 1
SFX 806 0 i .

SFX 807 N 1
SFX 807 0 ia .

SFX 808 N 1
SFX 808 0 ial .

SFX 809 N 1
SFX 809 0 ian .

SFX 810 N 1
SFX 810 0 ians .

SFX 811 N 1
SFX 811 0 iarian .

SFX 812 N 1
SFX 812 0 ias .

SFX 813 N 1
SFX 813 0 iasis .

SFX 814 N 1
SFX 814 0 iate .

SFX 815 N 1
SFX 815 0 iates .

SFX 816 N 1
SFX 816 0 iation .

SFX 817 N 1
SFX 817 0 iations .

SFX 818 N 1
SFX 818 0 ibleness .

SFX 819 N 1
SFX 819 0 ic .

SFX 820 N 1
SFX 820 0 icaemia .

SFX 821 N 1
SFX 821 0 ical .

SFX 822 N 1
SFX 822 0 ically .

SFX 823 N 1
SFX 823 0 icide .

SFX 824 N 1
SFX 824 0 icism .

SFX 825 N 1
SFX 825 0 icity .

SFX 826 N 1
SFX 826 0 ics .

SFX 827 N 1
SFX 827 0 icterus .

SFX 828 N 1
SFX 828 0 id .

SFX 829 N 1
SFX 829 0 ide .

SFX 830 N 1
SFX 830 0 idine .

SFX 831 N 1
SFX 831 0 idines .

SFX 832 N 1
SFX 832 0 idisation .

SFX 833 N 1
SFX 833 0 idise .

SFX 834 N 1
SFX 834 0 idization .

SFX 835 N 1
SFX 835 0 idize .

SFX 836 N 1
SFX 836 0 idized .

SFX 837 N 1
SFX 837 0 idizes .

SFX 838 N 1
SFX 838 0 idizing .

SFX 839 N 1
SFX 839 0 idna .

SFX 840 N 1
SFX 840 0 idnas .

SFX 841 N 1
SFX 841 0 ids .

SFX 842 N 1
SFX 842 0 ie .

SFX 843 N 1
SFX 843 0 ied .

SFX 844 N 1
SFX 844 0 ient .

SFX 845 N 1
SFX 845 0 ients .

SFX 846 N 1
SFX 846 0 ier .

SFX 847 N 1
SFX 847 0 iers .

SFX 848 N 1
SFX 848 0 ies .

SFX 849 N 1
SFX 849 0 iest .

SFX 850 N 1
SFX 850 0 iferous .

SFX 851 N 1
SFX 851 0 ific .

SFX 852 N 1
SFX 852 0 iglossis .

SFX 853 N 1
SFX 853 0 iglossises .

SFX 854 N 1
SFX 854 0 igueresco .

SFX 855 N 1
SFX 855 0 igueresque .

SFX 856 N 1
SFX 856 0 ii .

SFX 857 N 1
SFX 857 0 ikoto .

SFX 858 N 1
SFX 858 0 ilia .

SFX 859 N 1
SFX 859 0 illing .

SFX 860 N 1
SFX 860 0 illo .

SFX 861 N 1
SFX 861 0 ily .

SFX 862 N 1
SFX 862 0 ima .

SFX 863 N 1
SFX 863 0 imal .

SFX 864 N 1
SFX 864 0 imas .

SFX 865 N 1
SFX 865 0 imate .

SFX 866 N 1
SFX 866 0 imates .

SFX 867 N 1
SFX 867 0 imities .

SFX 868 N 1
SFX 868 0 imity .

SFX 869 N 1
SFX 869 0 imous .

SFX 870 N 1
SFX 870 0 in .

SFX 871 N 1
SFX 871 0 ina .

SFX 872 N 1
SFX 872 0 inate .

SFX 873 N 1
SFX 873 0 inated .

SFX 874 N 1
SFX 874 0 ination .

SFX 875 N 1
SFX 875 0 inations .

SFX 876 N 1
SFX 876 0 inator .

SFX 877 N 1
SFX 877 0 ine .

SFX 878 N 1
SFX 878 0 ines .

SFX 879 N 1
SFX 879 0 iness .

SFX 880 N 1
SFX 880 0 inesses .

SFX 881 N 1
SFX 881 0 infrastructure .

SFX 882 N 1
SFX 882 0 ing .

SFX 883 N 1
SFX 883 0 ingectomies .

SFX 884 N 1
SFX 884 0 ingectomy .

SFX 885 N 1
SFX 885 0 ingitis .

SFX 886 N 1
SFX 886 0 ingitises .

SFX 887 N 1
SFX 887 0 ingly .

SFX 888 N 1
SFX 888 0 ings .

SFX 889 N 1
SFX 889 0 inifer .

SFX 890 N 1
SFX 890 0 inocactus .

SFX 891 N 1
SFX 891 0 inococci .

SFX 892 N 1
SFX 892 0 inococcoses .

SFX 893 N 1
SFX 893 0 inococcosis .

SFX 894 N 1
SFX 894 0 inococcus .

SFX 895 N 1
SFX 895 0 inogen .

SFX 896 N 1
SFX 896 0 inogens .

SFX 897 N 1
SFX 897 0 ins .

SFX 898 N 1
SFX 898 0 int .

SFX 899 N 1
SFX 899 0 inted .

SFX 900 N 1
SFX 900 0 inting .

SFX 901 N 1
SFX 901 0 ints .

SFX 902 N 1
SFX 902 0 inus .

SFX 903 N 1
SFX 903 0 inx .

SFX 904 N 1
SFX 904 0 inxes .

SFX 905 N 1
SFX 905 0 ion .

SFX 906 N 1
SFX 906 0 ionary .

SFX 907 N 1
SFX 907 0 ions .

SFX 908 N 1
SFX 908 0 iosis .

SFX 909 N 1
SFX 909 0 iously .

SFX 910 N 1
SFX 910 0 iousness .

SFX 911 N 1
SFX 911 0 iousnesses .

SFX 912 N 1
SFX 912 0 ique .

SFX 913 N 1
SFX 913 0 is .

SFX 914 N 1
SFX 914 0 isable .

SFX 915 N 1
SFX 915 0 isation .

SFX 916 N 1
SFX 916 0 isations .

SFX 917 N 1
SFX 917 0 ise .

SFX 918 N 1
SFX 918 0 ised .

SFX 919 N 1
SFX 919 0 ises .

SFX 920 N 1
SFX 920 0 ish .

SFX 921 N 1
SFX 921 0 ishness .

SFX 922 N 1
SFX 922 0 ishnesses .

SFX 923 N 1
SFX 923 0 ising .

SFX 924 N 1
SFX 924 0 ism .

SFX 925 N 1
SFX 925 0 isms .

SFX 926 N 1
SFX 926 0 ist .

SFX 927 N 1
SFX 927 0 istic .

SFX 928 N 1
SFX 928 0 istical .

SFX 929 N 1
SFX 929 0 istribute .

SFX 930 N 1
SFX 930 0 ists .

SFX 931 N 1
SFX 931 0 ite .

SFX 932 N 1
SFX 932 0 ites .

SFX 933 N 1
SFX 933 0 iti .

SFX 934 N 1
SFX 934 0 itic .

SFX 935 N 1
SFX 935 0 ities .

SFX 936 N 1
SFX 936 0 itis .

SFX 937 N 1
SFX 937 0 itism .

SFX 938 N 1
SFX 938 0 ito .

SFX 939 N 1
SFX 939 0 itol .

SFX 940 N 1
SFX 940 0 itsa .

SFX 941 N 1
SFX 941 0 itsas .

SFX 942 N 1
SFX 942 0 itus .

SFX 943 N 1
SFX 943 0 ity .

SFX 944 N 1
SFX 944 0 ium .

SFX 945 N 1
SFX 945 0 iums .

SFX 946 N 1
SFX 946 0 ius .

SFX 947 N 1
SFX 947 0 ivalrous .

SFX 948 N 1
SFX 948 0 ivalrously .

SFX 949 N 1
SFX 949 0 ivator .

SFX 950 N 1
SFX 950 0 ive .

SFX 951 N 1
SFX 951 0 ivities .

SFX 952 N 1
SFX 952 0 ivity .

SFX 953 N 1
SFX 953 0 iyah .

SFX 954 N 1
SFX 954 0 iyar .

SFX 955 N 1
SFX 955 0 ization .

SFX 956 N 1
SFX 956 0 izations .

SFX 957 N 1
SFX 957 0 ize .

SFX 958 N 1
SFX 958 0 ized .

SFX 959 N 1
SFX 959 0 izer .

SFX 960 N 1
SFX 960 0 izes .

SFX 961 N 1
SFX 961 0 izing .

SFX 962 N 1
SFX 962 0 j .

SFX 963 N 1
SFX 963 0 jem .

SFX 964 N 1
SFX 964 0 jiagang .

SFX 965 N 1
SFX 965 0 jiajie .

SFX 966 N 1
SFX 966 0 jiakou .

SFX 967 N 1
SFX 967 0 jiang .

SFX 968 N 1
SFX 968 0 jove .

SFX 969 N 1
SFX 969 0 k .

SFX 970 N 1
SFX 970 0 kakulam .

SFX 971 N 1
SFX 971 0 kan .

SFX 972 N 1
SFX 972 0 kar .

SFX 973 N 1
SFX 973 0 karahisar .

SFX 974 N 1
SFX 974 0 ked .

SFX 975 N 1
SFX 975 0 keit .

SFX 976 N 1
SFX 976 0 kepses .

SFX 977 N 1
SFX 977 0 kepsis .
