Contents/Resources/Wolfram Player.app/Contents/SystemFiles/Components/SpellingData/SpellingDictionaries/en_Supplemental.dic
actin/82,807,809,810,811,812,819,829,924,925,1411,1421,1422,1429,1430,1431,1432,1433,1434,1437,1438,1439,1440,1441,1442,1443,1444,1445,1446,1447,1448,1449,1450,1481,1507,1527,1682
advect/950
Afyon/973
ament/13,807,812,850,1682
amort/915,916,917,918,919,923
Anatol/856
anonym/958,959,1682
antepenult/862,865,866,1682
appendicular/807
Aragua/871
arse/790,791,1241,1243,1305,1310,1323,1344,1345,1682
asper/731,732,733,734,1682,1696,1698,1704,1727,1742
Aziz/953
bakshis/773,780
behaviour/82,924,926,927,930,1682
benedict/950,1682
Blanc/781
bolo/750,751,752,1179,1180,1184,1682
bosk/846,849,1482,1999
brahmin/819,821
brome/756,757,1036,1502,1682
cabbala/773,799,1682
cadent/808
callithump/809,1682
cardio/752,753,755,1091,1159,1224,1225,1226,1541,1544,1622,1745,1827
Chao/800,1922,2001,2028
Cherkess/969
chou/724,726,1696,1698,1704,1727
chromogen/819
churr/565,854,855,882,1682
clon/819,830,831,1682,1941,1944
coact/565,882,905,907,949,1682
combinator/826,1682,1999
combust/565,818,882,1487,1682
commensal/924,925,1108,1682
confect/565,882,906,1682
copal/877,931,1682
copolymer/917,918,919,923,957,958,960,961,1682
coreferent/808
cornel/809,810,1682
costal/728
cryogen/822,848,1682,1999
cryptograph/821,1682
cuirass/646,846,847
cymbid/944,945
dacryocyst/936
Daman/795
decoct/565,882,905,907,1682
decolor/565,882,917,957,958,960,961,1682
decolour/917,957
diamagnet/819,924,925,1682
dibranch/814,815
dimensional/957,958,960
dimethyl/740
diphenyl/804,805
dromaeosaur/828,841
Duma/763,806
ech/839,840,890,891,892,893,894,902,1384,1385,1386,1397,1398,1399,1408,1409,1418,1419,1420,1519,1520,1785
ectomorph/819,848,1682,1999
elater/828,841,1682
engraft/565,882,1682
enterolith/813
equid/929,1682
eudaemon/807,819,1682
evangel/915,917,955,1682
fantast/912,1682
ferromagnet/924,925
fila/723,742,758,759,1173,1590,1614,1615,1631,1632,1633,1634,1635,1639,1905,1906
frijol/557,646,860,938
genet/821,824,1682
glamour/565,882,915,917,955,1513,1682
glute/82,806,1040,1050,1825,1941
gorger/870,897
hadrosaur/828,1682,1941
halobacter/807,944
harbours/829
hawse/790,791,1562,1563,1682
heller/806,913,1682
helminth/813,819,826,1682
hopsack/882,888,1682
humour/565,882,926,1028,1029,1513,1682
hyalin/557,646,915,955,956,1682
Igbo/788
immunogen/819,825,1682
intersectional/943
intussuscept/905,907
Jincheng/967
kabbala/773,799,1682
Kac/783
Kashi/775,1582,1963
kern/827,931,932
Kuni/782,1682
Lafia/727
laic/917,957,958,960,961
leger/935,943,1682
Linz/798
lister/908,1682
logomach/926,930,1682,1999
lucifer/206,870,897,1682
Madina/773,1785
madrasa/773,799,1682
Makat/806
mandator/861
mantic/796,1488,1489,1490
massicot/931
Mau/1,725
metonym/819,821,822,1682
microblog/735
micrometeor/819,934,1411
monobloc/969
myxobacter/807,944
natator/944,945
naturopath/819,848,1682,1999
neighbour/565,793,794,882,1042,1108,1682
Nek/972
nephrolith/813
neurolinguist/826
noninstitutional/918,958
Nusa/971
nymphal/828,841
odour/917,1028,1682
omphalos/646,976,977
Oster/749
paediatric/809,810
paraph/858,1601,1602,1603,1619,2010,2011,2012,2014
parasail/882,888,1682
penult/862,864,1682
percept/951,952,1656,1659,1682
phantasma/748
Picard/842
polytonal/924,935,943
pretor/808,809,944,1682
propos/933,942
psychosexual/935,943
radiophoto/751,755
refractor/879,880
repo/898,899,900,901,1002,1581,1672,1682,1731,1732,1756,1785,1893,1895,1896,1974,1975
ridgel/877,878,882,1682
Salim/953
Sanda/971
sartor/856,946,1682
savour/565,846,848,849,882,1028,1030,1682,1999
sawm/859
screak/565,861,882,1682,1999
seism/82,825,1497,1682
self/793,842,848
smarm/861,879,880,1682
smoulder/565,882,887,1682
sopor/850
spatchcock/565,882,1682
spinnbar/975
Sri/963,970,1329
sudor/851,1682
sura/799
Susa/773
Talca/801
Tay/722
telepath/917,926,930,957,958,960,961,1682
theatre/743,744,1682
thrip/828,1682,1704
titanosaur/809,1682
trochlear/913,1682
tsar/927,940,941,1682
tympan/819,932,934,936,1480,1682
unreason/887,1682
uxor/808,823,909,910,911,913
vapour/851,914,918,920,1513,1515,1682
vatic/82,872,874,875,876
vesuvian/931,932,1682
Yona/742
Zhang/964,965,966,1561,1585,1717,2005,2028
